District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.20

Priority development areas.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 21, 45 DCR 3747
June 13, 2001, D.C. Law 13-312, § 705(b)(2), 48 DCR 3804
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 201(a)(2), 51 DCR 9142
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2295.20.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 201(a)(2) of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).